Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.84.545

Paper record from direct recording electronic voting device—Removing from voting center.

Anyone who, without authorization, removes from a voting center a paper record produced by a direct recording electronic voting device is guilty of a class C felony punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.

[ 2011 c 10 s 73; 2005 c 242 s 6.]

NOTES:

Notice to registered poll voters—Elections by mail—2011 c 10: See note following RCW 29A.04.008.

Paper records: RCW 29A.12.085, 29A.60.095.